Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Part 1

Examinations

59-4-101. Position of mine foreman — Examinations for applicants.

The commissioner of labor and workforce development or the commissioner's representative is hereby authorized to develop, conduct, and administer an examination for applicants for certificates of qualification for the position of mine foreman and to ascertain the qualifications of such applicants.

Acts 1915, ch. 169, § 13; Shan., § 3079a99; Code 1932, § 5582; Acts 1949, ch. 190, § 5; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 5582; Acts 1953, ch. 86, § 22 (Williams, §§ 5582, 5638.22); Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-401; Acts 1985, ch. 288, § 19; 1992, ch. 574, § 2; 1999, ch. 520, § 43.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Law — 1959 Tennessee Survey (Harold Seligman), 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1057.